North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 28. Records and Reports of Milk Distributors and Processors.

§ 106-260.
“Milk” defined.

Wherever the word “milk” appears hereinafter in this Article, it shall be construed to include all whole milk, cream, chocolate milk, buttermilk, skim milk, special milk and all flavored milk, including flavored drinks, skim condensed, whole condensed, dry milks and evaporated.

History.

1941, c. 162, s. 1; 1951, c. 1133, s. 1.

§ 106-261.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-10, s. 3.10, effective May 4, 2017.

History.

1947, c. 162, s. 2; 1951, c. 1133, s. 2; repealed by 2017-10, s. 3.10, effective May 4, 2017.

§ 106-262.
Powers of Commissioner of Agriculture.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is hereby authorized and empowered:

To require such reports as will enable him to determine the quantities of milk purchased and the classification in which it was used or disposed;

To designate any area of the State as a natural marketing area for the sale or use of milk or milk products;

To set up classifications for the sale or use of milk or milk products for each marketing area after full, complete and impartial hearing. Due notice of such hearing shall be given.

To make rules and regulations and issue orders necessary to carry out and enforce the provisions of this Article, including the supervision of producer bases and other production incentive plans; methods of uniform and equitable payments to all producers selling milk to the same firm, person or corporation; uniform methods of computing weights of milk and/or milk products; and maximum handling and transportation charges for milk sold and/or transferred between plants.

History.

1941, c. 162, s. 3; 1951, c. 1133, s. 3.

§ 106-263.
Distribution of milk in classification higher than that in which purchased.

It shall be unlawful for any operator of a milk processing plant or any milk distributor, required to make reports under this Article, or their affiliates or subsidiaries, to sell, use, transfer, or distribute any milk in a classification higher than the classification in which it was purchased, except in an emergency declared and approved in writing by the local board of health having supervision of operators and distributors on such market for a period of two weeks, and such period may be extended if, in the opinion of the local board of health, an emergency still exists at the end of such two weeks’ period.

History.

1941, c. 162, s. 4.

§ 106-264.
Inspections and investigations by Commissioner.

For the purpose of administering this Article the Commissioner of Agriculture or his agent is hereby authorized to enter at all reasonable hours all places where milk is being stored, bottled, or processed, or where milk is being bought, sold, or handled, or where books, papers, records, or documents relating to such transactions are kept, and shall have the power to inspect and copy the same in any place within the State, and may take testimony for the purpose of ascertaining facts which in the judgment of the Commissioner are necessary to administer this Article. The Commissioner shall have the power to determine the truth and accuracy of said books, records, papers, documents, accounts, and reports required to be furnished by milk distributors, their affiliates or subsidiaries in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

History.

1941, c. 162, s. 5.

§ 106-265.
Failure to file reports, etc., made unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation engaged in the business herein regulated to fail to furnish the information and file the reports required by this Article, and each day’s failure to furnish the reports required hereunder shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

1941, c. 162, s. 6.

§ 106-266.
Violation made misdemeanor.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this Article and/or any rule, regulation or order promulgated in accordance with the provisions of this Article shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1941, c. 162, s. 7; 1951, c. 1133, s. 4; 1993, c. 539, s. 753; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).